South Dakota, session 2026, SB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 61-6-8 be AMENDED:
61-6-8. Unless the provisions of §§ 61-6-49 to 61-6-64, inclusive, apply, an
individual's maximum benefit amount is an amount equal to one-third of the individual's
total base period wages in covered employment not to exceed twenty-six twelve twenty-
two times the individual's weekly benefit amount. If that amount is not a multiple of one
dollar, it is lowered to the next lower multiple of one dollar.
Trade readjustment payments may allow an individual to receive benefits in excess
of twenty-six twelve twenty-two weeks if the individual is in training approved by the
secretary under the Trade Act of 1974, as amended by section 2501 of P.L. 97-35--August
13, 1981, and then only as long as necessary to complete the training.
If the benefit year of an individual ends within an extended benefit period, the
number of weeks of extended benefits that the individual would, but for this section, be
entitled to in that extended benefit period is reduced by the number of weeks for which
the individual received any amounts as trade readjustment allowances within that benefit
year, multiplied by the individual's weekly benefit amount for extended benefits.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.